North Dakota, session 69, SB2407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LINE OF CREDIT - BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA - APPROPRIATION - STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY - NORTH DAKOTA MILITARY MUSEUM PROJECT - DEFICIENCY
APPROPRIATION REQUEST - ONE-TIME FUNDING - LEGISLATIVE INTENT - REPORT.
1. Subject to the provisions of this section, the state historical society may borrow up to
$20,000,000 through a line of credit from the Bank of North Dakota during the period
beginning with the effective date of this Act, and ending June 30, 2027, the proceeds of which
are appropriated to the state historical society, for the purpose of the North Dakota military
museum project for the period beginning with the effective date of this Act, and ending
June 30, 2027. The appropriation in this section is considered a one-time funding item.
2. The interest rate on the line of credit may not exceed the prevailing interest rate charged to
North Dakota governmental entities. If the state historical society accesses the line of credit,
the state historical society shall repay the line of credit from other funds derived from
donations appropriated by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly to the state historical society in
House Bill No. 1018. If the amount of donations collected through March 31, 2029, is not
sufficient to repay the line of credit and accrued interest, the seventy-first legislative assembly
shall consider extending the line of credit or evaluate available funding sources for repayment
of the line of credit. The state historical society may not access the line of credit until funding
appropriated by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly from the strategic investment and
improvements fund in House Bill No. 1018 has been spent.
3. The capital grounds planning commission shall:
a. Oversee and have final decisionmaking authority regarding the North Dakota military
museum project;
b. Collaborate with the state historical society and adjutant general on the project; and
c. Use the office of management and budget for construction management of the project.
4. It is the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that the state of North Dakota provide total
state funding of $39,200,000, which includes funding appropriated from the strategic
investment and improvements fund for the repayment of a $4,200,000 Bank of North Dakota
line of credit, the repayment of a $20,000,000 Bank of North Dakota line of credit, and
$15,000,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund, plus any
additional funding necessary to pay interest accrued on the $20,000,000 Bank of North
Dakota line of credit, related to the North Dakota military museum project and that any
remaining costs associated with the project be paid by nonstate sources derived from
donations. It is further the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that the capitol grounds
planning commission and the state historical society prioritize construction that supports

S. B. NO. 2407 - PAGE 2
completion of the exterior of the military museum building to avoid any additional costs
incurred due to inclement weather and that no work related to galleries and displays in the
interior of the military museum building be performed without consent of the capitol grounds
planning commission.
5. The state historical society shall report to the budget section on a quarterly basis during the
2027-28 interim information regarding the North Dakota military museum project, including the
status of construction, amounts spent by funding source, the amount drawn on all lines of
credit authorized for the project, signed pledge commitments, collected cash, proposed gifts
being discussed but not yet committed, and the anticipated project completion date.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 55-01-02.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
55-01-02.1. Society to have jurisdiction over heritage center.
1. The society has jurisdiction over the administration and operations of the North Dakota
heritage center building. The director of the office of management and budget is responsible
for maintenance of the heritage center building.
2. The society, in consultation with the adjutant general, is responsible for all public displays,
signage, and museum content for the North Dakota military gallerymuseum within the North
Dakota heritage center building. The society and the adjutant general shall enter a
memorandum of agreement to establish policies on public displays, signage, and museum
content for the military gallerymuseum. The regimental room of the military gallerymuseum
must be named the North Dakota national guard regimental room. The society may name
other rooms, displays, galleries, and areas of the military museum but may not authorize
donor naming rights for any part of the military museum without prior approval from the
emergency commission and budget section.
3. The society shall maintain the collections displayed and stored at the heritage center and shall
provide, or arrange, for the security of those collections.
4. The society shall establish a policy that authorizes the consumption of alcoholic beverages,
including distilled spirits as defined in section 5-01-01, at the heritage center during an event
that is open only to invited guests and if the alcoholic beverages are dispensed by a qualified
alcoholic beverage licensee.
SECTION 3. REPEAL. Subsection 3 of section 6 of chapter 17 of the 2025 Session Laws is
repealed.
SECTION 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act becomes effective immediately upon its filing with the
secretary of state.

S. B. NO. 2407 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2407.
Senate Vote: Yeas 39 Nays 8 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 71 Nays 22 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2026.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2026.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2026,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State